Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-102
Rules; copies; distribution; filing.

The Jail Standards Board shall, as soon as may be, cause a copy of the rules to be delivered to the county boards. It shall be the duty of each county board forthwith to cause the same to be printed, to furnish the sheriff of its county or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail with a copy of the rules for every room or cell of the jail, and to forward a copy of the rules by mail to the Auditor of Public Accounts, who shall carefully file away and preserve the same.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 2, p. 243;

R.S.1913, § 3530;

C.S.1922, § 2997;

C.S.1929, § 47-102;

R.S.1943, § 47-102;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 3.